Maryland, session 2025, HB1041.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
13–301.
Unfair, abusive, or deceptive trade practices include any:
(14) Violation of a provision of:
(xlii) Section 12–6C–09.1 of the Health Occupations Article; [or]
(xliii) Title 14, Subtitle 48 of this article; or
(XLIV) SECTION 11B–112.4 OF THE REAL PROPERTY
ARTICLE; OR
Article – Real Property
11B–112.2.
(c) The annual budget shall provide for at least the following items:
(1) Income;
(2) Administration;
(3) Maintenance;
(4) Utilities;

HOUSE BILL 1041 3
(5) General expenses;
(6) Reserves; and
(7) Capital expenses.
(d) (1) [Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN
PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, reserves provided for in the annual
budget under subsection (c) of this section shall be the funding amount recommended in
the most recent reserve study completed under § 11B–112.3 of this title.
(2) If the most recent reserve study was an initial reserve study, the
governing body shall, within 3 fiscal years following the fiscal year in which the initial
reserve study was completed, attain the annual reserve funding level recommended in the
initial reserve study.
(3) IF THE HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION EXPERIENCES EXIGENT
FINANCIAL CIRCUMSTANCES, THE GOVERNING BODY MAY FUND RESERVES IN
ACCORDANCE WITH A RESERVE RECOVERY PLAN ADOPTED UNDER § 11B–112.4 OF
THIS TITLE.
11B–112.4.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “EXIGENT FINANCIAL CIRCUMSTANCES” MEANS SIGNIFICANT
FINANCIAL HARDSHIP CAUSED BY AN UNANTICIPATED EVENT SUCH AS:
(I) A FIRE, FLOOD, OR OTHER NATURAL DISASTER THAT
INFLICTS SUBSTANTIAL DAMAGE TO REAL PROPERTY;
(II) FRAUD, EMBEZZLEMENT, OR A SIMILAR FINANCIAL
MISAPPROPRIATION; AND
(III) ANY SIMILAR EMERGENCY OR CATASTROPHIC EVENT.
(3) “RESERVE RECOVERY PLAN” MEANS A DOCUMENT CREATED BY A
GOVERNING BODY THAT IDENTIFIES AND EXPLAINS, IN DETAIL:
(I) THE EXIGENT FINANCIAL CIRCUMSTANCES OF A
HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION;

HOUSE BILL 1041
(II) DAMAGE CAUSED BY THE EXIGENT FINANCIAL
CIRCUMSTANCES, INCLUDING ESTIMATES OF THE COST OF ANY REMEDIAL
MEASURES; AND
(III) THE FUNDING STRATEGY, TIMELINE, AND RELATED
ACTIONS PLANNED TO BRING THE HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION INTO COMPLIANCE
WITH THE RESERVE FUNDING REQUIREMENTS UNDER § 11B–112.2(D) OF THIS
TITLE.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION THAT
HAS RESPONSIBILITY UNDER ITS DECLARATION FOR MAINTAINING AND REPAIRING
COMMON AREAS.
(C) (1) A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION THAT EXPERIENCES EXIGENT
FINANCIAL CIRCUMSTANCES MAY REASONABLY DEVIATE FROM RESERVE FUNDING
REQUIREMENTS OF § 11B–112.2(D) OF THIS TITLE IF THE GOVERNING BODY:
(I) WITHIN 90 DAYS AFTER DISCOVERY OF THE EXIGENT
FINANCIAL CIRCUMSTANCES, ADOPTS BY A TWO–THIRDS MAJORITY OF THE
GOVERNING BODY A RESERVE RECOVERY PLAN TO ADDRESS THE EXIGENT
FINANCIAL CIRCUMSTANCES OF THE HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION;
(II) MAKES GOOD FAITH EFFORTS TO:
1. COMPLY WITH THE RESERVE RECOVERY PLAN UNDER
ITEM (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH; AND
2. RESTORE THE RESERVE FUNDING TO REQUIRED
LEVELS WITHIN A REASONABLE PERIOD OF TIME;
(III) MAINTAINS DETAILED DOCUMENTATION OF:
1. EFFORTS TO ADDRESS THE EXIGENT FINANCIAL
CIRCUMSTANCES; AND
2. THE IMPLEMENTATION OF THE RESERVE RECOVERY
PLAN; AND
(IV) ON A QUARTERLY BASIS, PROVIDES UPDATES TO LOT
OWNERS ON THE PROGRESS OF THE RESERVE RECOVERY PLAN.
(2) A GOVERNING BODY SHALL:

HOUSE BILL 1041 5
(I) NOTIFY ALL LOT OWNERS AT LEAST 5 DAYS BEFORE
HOLDING A VOTE TO APPROVE A RESERVE RECOVERY PLAN UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1)(I) OF THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(II) PROVIDE A COPY OF THE ADOPTED RESERVE RECOVERY
PLAN TO EACH LOT OWNER.
(D) (1) THE FOLLOWING DOCUMENTS SHALL BE TREATED AS RECORDS
FOR EXAMINATION AND COPYING UNDER § 11B–112 OF THIS TITLE:
(I) THE RESERVE RECOVERY PLAN; AND
(II) THE DOCUMENTATION REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION
(C)(1)(III) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) A GOVERNING BODY SHALL PROVIDE RECORDS DESCRIBED
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION TO A UNIT OF STATE GOVERNMENT ON
REQUEST.
(E) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A
HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION MAY NOT DEVIATE FROM THE RESERVE FUNDING
REQUIREMENTS UNDER § 11B–112.2(D) OF THIS TITLE FOR MORE THAN 3
CALENDAR YEARS.
(2) THE LIMITATION UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION IS:
(I) FOR EACH EXIGENT FINANCIAL CIRCUMSTANCE THAT A
HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION EXPERIENCES; AND
(II) IN ADDITION TO ANY APPLICABLE TIME PERIOD PROVIDED
UNDER § 11B–112.2(D) OF THIS TITLE.
(F) IF A GOVERNING BODY FAILS TO COMPLY WITH THE REQUIREMENTS
AND PROHIBITIONS OF THIS SECTION, THE GOVERNING BODY SHALL COMPLY WITH
THE RESERVE FUNDING REQUIREMENTS UNDER § 11B–112.2(D) OF THIS TITLE.
(G) (1) TO THE EXTENT THAT A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION BY A
GOVERNING BODY AFFECTS A LOT OWNER, THAT VIOLATION IS:
(I) AN UNFAIR, ABUSIVE, OR DECEPTIVE TRADE PRACTICE
WITHIN THE MEANING OF TITLE 13 OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE; AND

HOUSE BILL 1041
(II) SUBJECT TO THE ENFORCEMENT AND PENALTY
PROVISIONS CONTAINED IN TITLE 13 OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE.
(2) A LOT OWNER THAT SUFFERS DAMAGES AS A RESULT OF A
VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION BY A GOVERNING BODY MAY BRING AN ACTION IN A
COURT OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION FOR:
(I) INJUNCTIVE RELIEF; AND
(II) DAMAGES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.